North Carolina, session 2025, HB644.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the Highway Fund to the Department of
Transportation for the 2025-2026 fiscal year the sum of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000)
in nonrecurring funds to be used by the Department to study and identify the economic benefits
from reducing the traffic congestion on the portion of road between the intersection of Vass Road
and N.C. Highway 87 and the entrance to Fort Bragg. The study shall include examining
expanded rail routes and other surface transportation.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H644-v-1*